Washington statutes.
RCW 1.12.020

Statutes continued, when.

The provisions of a statute, so far as they are substantially the same as those of a statute existing at the time of their enactment, must be construed as continuations thereof.

[1891 c 23 s 1, part; Code 1881 ss 761, 1292, 1681; RRS s 145.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section is a part of 1891 c 23 s 1. The introductory phrase of that section provides: "The following provisions relative to the construction of statutes shall be rules of construction and shall constitute a part of the code of procedure of this state:".

Laws in force continued: State Constitution Art. 27 s 2.